Washington statutes.
RCW 11.110.090

Uniformity of chapter with laws of other states.

It is the purpose of this chapter to make uniform the laws of this and other states on the subject of charitable trusts and similar relationships. Recognizing the necessity for uniform application and enforcement of this chapter, its provisions are hereby declared mandatory and they shall not be superseded by the provisions of any trust instrument or similar instrument to the contrary.

[ 1985 c 30 s 122. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 53 s 9. Formerly RCW 19.10.090.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.